Massachusetts, session 194th, H2669.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 146 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 official edition, is hereby
amended by adding at the end of section 65 the following new language:
The division of occupational licensure shall make both written and practical examinations
available in the languages of English, Portuguese, Spanish and any other languages deemed
appropriate by the division, to hoisting machinery applicants licensed under section 53A (g) if
the criteria for licensure established by the commissioner of the division of occupational
licensure pursuant to section fifty-three are met by the applicant.
of 1